Vermont, session 2025-2026, H403.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Agricultural Workers’ Fair Labor Standards
and Housing Act.”
VT LEG #380747 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.403
2025 Page 2 of 7
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
§ 383. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.
(2) “Employee” means any individual employed or permitted to work by
an employer except:
(A) any individual employed in agriculture, provided the individual is
the agricultural employer’s parent, spouse, or child;
* * *
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2022, an employer shall not employ any
employee at a rate of less than $12.55, and on each subsequent January 1, the
minimum wage rate shall be increased by five percent or the percentage
increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. city average, not seasonally
adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or
successor agency for the 12 months preceding the previous September 1,
whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the minimum wage be decreased.
The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the nearest $0.01.
* * *
VT LEG #380747 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.403
2025 Page 3 of 7
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an employer shall not
pay an employee less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any
work done by the employee in excess of 40 hours during a workweek.
However, this subsection shall not apply to:
* * *
(9) Any individual employed in agriculture, provided the employee
receives not less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any
work done by the employee in excess of 60 hours per week, effective January
1, 2026. This subdivision shall not apply if the individual is the agricultural
employer’s parent, spouse, or child.
* * *
Sec. 4. 6 V.S.A. chapter 213 is added to read:
CHAPTER 213. ADEQUACY OF FARM EMPLOYEE HOUSING
§ 4751. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Farm” has the same meaning as in section 2.14 of the Required
Agricultural Practices.
(2) “Farm employee” means an individual employed by a farm
employer for farming.
(3) “Farm employee housing” means housing owned or controlled by a
farm employer, whether located on or off the farm premises and provided for
VT LEG #380747 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.403
2025 Page 4 of 7
the occupancy of the farm employee and the farm employee’s family or
household members.
(4) “Farm employer” means a person engaged in farming who is:
(A) required to obtain a large farm permit or medium farm permit
under chapter 215 of this title; or
(B) is subject to the Required Agricultural Practices under chapter
215 of this title and who earns at least one quarter of their annual gross income
from the business of farming.
(5) “Farming” has the same meaning as in section 2.16 of the Required
Agricultural Practices.
(6) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
§ 4752. ADEQUACY OF FARM EMPLOYEE HOUSING; INSPECTION
(a) When the Secretary conducts a scheduled inspection of a farm under
chapter 215 of this title, the Secretary shall determine if farm employee
housing is in use on the farm and shall survey farm employees regarding the
adequacy, availability, and safety of the farm employee housing.
(b)(1) To facilitate the survey of the farm employee housing, the Secretary
shall provide farm employees with a form containing questions regarding the
farm employee housing. The form shall, at a minimum, include the following
questions:
VT LEG #380747 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.403
2025 Page 5 of 7
(A) Is the farm employee housing provided voluntarily or are you
required to reside in the farm employee housing as a condition of employment?
(B) Was the farm employee housing provided in clean working
order?
(C) Does the farm employer provide proper and timely maintenance,
without undue delay?
(D) Do you pay rent for the farm employee housing?
(E) If you pay rent, does the rent reduce your net wages below the
prevailing minimum wage?
(F) Does the farm employee housing provide sleeping areas with
doors or other ability to maintain privacy?
(G) Is the farm employee housing provided with adequate heat,
safety, ventilation, windows, or temperature control?
(2) If the Secretary knows prior to an inspection that farm employees
reside in farm employee housing on a farm, the Secretary shall make the form
required in subdivision (1) of this subsection available to the farm employees
prior to the inspection.
(3) The Secretary shall ensure that the form provided to farm employees
is accessible in multiple languages and shall provide interpretation or
translation services if necessary for a farm employee to complete the form.
VT LEG #380747 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.403
2025 Page 6 of 7
(c) If the Secretary determines that a farm employer has obstructed the
completion of a survey form under this section, the Secretary may assess an
administrative penalty against the farm employer under the Secretary’s
authority in chapter 1 of this title.
§ 4753. FILING WITH DIVISION OF FIRE SAFETY
(a) A copy of each form submitted by a farm employee to the Secretary
under this section shall be submitted to the Division of Fire Safety to inform
whether the Division should conduct an inspection of the farm employee
housing to determine whether or not it is safe for occupation.
(b) If the Division of Fire Safety conducts an inspection of farm employee
housing, the Division shall assess whether the farm employee housing satisfies
the requirements of the Vermont Residential Rental Housing Health and Safety
Code and shall conduct an inspection consistent with the requirements of 20
V.S.A. § 2677.
(c) If the Division of Fire Safety determines that the farm employee
housing is in violation of the Vermont Residential Rental Housing Health and
Safety Code, the Division shall provide the farm employer the opportunity to
comply with requirements and timelines in the inspection report.
(d) If a farm employer fails to comply with a Division of Fire Safety
requirement or timeline, the Division may impose an administrative penalty
VT LEG #380747 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.403
2025 Page 7 of 7
reasonably related to the severity of the violation, not to exceed $1,000.00 per
violation.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380747 v.1